District of Columbia statutes.
44-2106

Repealed

Private patients.

Repealed.

R.S., D.C., §§ 4853, 4854
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(a)
1981 Ed., § 32-606.
1973 Ed., § 32-406.
Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.